Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1116
Treatment, defined.

Treatment means the support and services which will assist a subject to acquire the skills and behaviors needed to function in society so that the subject does not pose a threat of harm to others and is able to cope with his or her personal needs and the demands of his or her environment.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 16.